Maine, session 132, LD1766.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Legislative intent. In 1967, the Legislature finally passed Resolve 1967,
chapter 77, which proposed to amend the Constitution of Maine by repealing Article VI,
Section 6, "effective at such time as the Legislature by proper enactment shall establish a
different Probate Court system with full-time judges." The constitutional amendment in
Resolve 1967, chapter 77 was approved by a majority of the voters of Maine on November
7, 1967. It is the intent of the Legislature that the enactment of this Act, which creates a
statewide Probate Court with full-time judges, triggers the repeal of the Constitution of
Maine, Article VI, Section 6 pursuant to Resolve 1967, chapter 77 and will eliminate the
ethical issues that arise when part-time probate judges are permitted to engage in the
practice of law.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 4 MRSA §9-A, first ¶, as amended by PL 1987, c. 736, §2, is further
amended to read:
The Supreme Judicial Court shall have has the power and authority to prescribe, repeal,
add to, amend or modify rules of evidence with respect to any and all civil actions or other
proceedings, and any and all proceedings in criminal cases before justices of the peace,
District Courts, probate courts Probate Courts, Superior Courts and the Supreme Judicial
Court.
Sec. B-2. 4 MRSA §9-B, as amended by PL 1999, c. 547, Pt. B, §3 and affected by
§80, is further amended to read:
§9-B. Committee on judicial responsibility and disability
The Supreme Judicial Court has the power and authority to prescribe, repeal, add to,
amend or modify rules relating to a committee to receive complaints, make investigations
and make recommendations to the Supreme Judicial Court in regard to discipline,
disability, retirement or removal of justices of the Supreme Judicial Court and the Superior
Court and judges of the District Court and the probate courts Probate Courts.
Sec. B-3. 4 MRSA §57, first ¶, as amended by PL 1999, c. 731, Pt. ZZZ, §2 and
affected by §42, is further amended to read:
The following cases only come before the court as a court of law: Cases on appeal from
the District Court, the Superior Court or a single Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court or
from the probate courts Probate Court; questions of law arising on reports of cases,
including interlocutory orders or rulings of such importance as to require, in the opinion of
the justice, review by the Law Court before any further proceedings in the action; agreed
statement of facts; cases presenting a question of law; all questions arising in cases in which
equitable relief is sought; motions to dissolve injunctions issued after notice and hearing or
continued after a hearing; questions arising on habeas corpus, mandamus and certiorari;
and questions of state law certified by the federal courts. They must be marked "law" on
the docket of the county or district where they are pending, and there continued until their
determination is certified by the Clerk of the Law Court to the Register of Probate or clerk
of courts of the county and the court shall immediately after the decision of the question
submitted to it make such order, direction, judgment or decree as is fit and proper for the
Page 1 - 132LR1103(01)

414 disposal of the case, and cause a rescript in all civil actions, briefly stating the points therein
425 decided, to be filed therein, which rescript must be certified by the Clerk of the Law Court
436 to the Register of Probate or clerk of courts of the county or district where the action is
447 pending and to the Reporter of Decisions. If no further opinion is written out, the reporter
458 shall publish in the next volume of reports thereafter issued the case, together with such
469 rescript, if the reporter deems the same of sufficient importance for publication.
Sec. B-4. 4 MRSA §105, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 731, Pt. ZZZ, §3
and affected §42, is amended to read:
A. Concurrent or exclusive jurisdiction is vested in the District Court or the Probate
Court; or
Sec. B-5. 4 MRSA §152, sub-§4, as repealed and replaced by PL 2013, c. 21, §1,
is amended to read:
4. Exclusive jurisdiction. Original jurisdiction, not concurrent with that of the
Superior Court or Probate Court, of mental health commitment hearings under Title 34‑B,
chapter 3, subchapter 4,; habitual truancy actions under Title 20‑A, chapters 119 and 211
under which equitable relief may be granted; and small claims actions under Title 14,
chapter 738;
Sec. B-6. 4 MRSA §152, sub-§5-A, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 63, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Any proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code brought against the minor
child pending in the District Court or any proceeding involving custody or other
parental rights with respect to the minor child pending before any court of this State
or another state, including before a probate court in this State the Probate Court; or
Sec. B-7. 4 MRSA §152, sub-§5-A, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 63, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Any other related action pending before any court of this State or another state,
including before a probate court in this State the Probate Court.
Sec. B-8. 4 MRSA §152, sub-§5-A, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 63, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. Except as provided in paragraph C, if the District Court presiding over any matter
under the Maine Juvenile Code brought against a minor child and any matter involving
custody or other parental rights with respect to a minor child becomes aware that a
proceeding for guardianship, adoption or change of name or another matter involving
custody or other parental rights with respect to the minor child under Title 18‑C is
pending in a probate court in this State the Probate Court, the District Court shall notify
the Probate Court and take appropriate action to facilitate a transfer of the matter from
the Probate Court. If a matter is transferred to the District Court under this paragraph,
the District Court has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the matter and over any
future proceedings for guardianship, adoption or change of name or other matter
involving custody or other parental rights with respect to the minor child brought under
Title 18‑C, except to the extent that the District Court's jurisdiction is precluded by the
Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.
Page 2 - 132LR1103(01)

Sec. B-9. 4 MRSA §152, sub-§5-A, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 63, §1, is
amended to read:
C. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a probate court the Probate
Court shall retain jurisdiction over an action for guardianship, adoption, change of
name or other matter involving custody or other parental rights with respect to a minor
child brought under Title 18‑C that would otherwise be within the exclusive,
continuing jurisdiction of the District Court under this subsection and may not transfer
that matter to the District Court under paragraph B if:
(1) At the time the proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code or the proceeding
involving custody or other parental rights with respect to the minor child that would
otherwise trigger the District Court's continuing, exclusive jurisdiction is initiated,
the testimonial hearing on the Title 18‑C matter has concluded and the Probate
Court has that matter under advisement; and
(2) The Probate Court has not determined that the District Court is the more
appropriate forum for the Title 18‑C proceeding;
Sec. B-10. 4 MRSA §201 is repealed.
Sec. B-11. 4 MRSA §201-A is enacted to read:
§201-A. Establishment; court of record; seal; process; contempt power
1. Definition. As used in this Title, unless the context otherwise indicates, "Probate
Court" includes:
A. Prior to January 1, 2029, each county Probate Court for which the term of the
county's Probate Court Judge elected or appointed under the former Constitution of
Maine, Article VI, Section 6 or elected under section 301-A, subsection 1 has not yet
expired. This paragraph does not include any county probate court in which a vacancy
occurs after January 1, 2027 due to the death, resignation, removal from the county or
permanent incapacity as defined in Title 30-A, section 1, subsection 2-A of the elected
county Probate Court Judge; and
B. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Probate Court established under subsection 2,
paragraph B in each county in which the term of the most recent county Probate Court
Judge elected under the former Constitution of Maine, Article VI, Section 6 or under
section 301-A, subsection 1 has expired or in which a vacancy occurs after January 1,
2027 due to the death, resignation, removal from the county or permanent incapacity
as defined in Title 30-A, section 1, subsection 2-A of the elected county Probate Court
Judge.
2. Establishment; court of record; seal. The provisions of this section govern the
Probate Court.
A. Each county Probate Court described in subsection 1, paragraph A, as heretofore
established, is a court of record. The Register of Probate shall maintain custody of the
official seal of the county Probate Court.
B. A Probate Court for the State is established on January 1, 2027 as a court of record
in the counties described in subsection 1, paragraph B. The Chief Judge of the Probate
Court shall establish the official seal of the court and provide the official seal to the
Register of Probate in each county described in subsection 1, paragraph B.
Page 3 - 132LR1103(01)

3. Process; contempt power. The Probate Court may issue any process necessary for
the discharge of official duties and may punish for contempt of the court's authority.
Sec. B-12. 4 MRSA §202, as amended by PL 1981, c. 456, Pt. A, §5, is further
amended to read:
§202. Oaths and acknowledgments
All oaths required to be taken by personal representatives, trustees, guardians, or
conservators, or of any other persons in relation to any proceeding in the probate court
Probate Court, or to perpetuate the evidence of the publication of any order of notice, may
be administered by the judge Probate Court Judge or register of probate Register of Probate
or any notary public. A certificate thereof, when taken out of court, shall must be returned
into the registry of probate and there filed. When any person of whom such oath is required,
including any parent acknowledging consent to an adoption, resides temporarily or
permanently without outside of the State, the oath or acknowledgment may be taken before
and be certified by a notary public without the State in another state, a commissioner for
the State of Maine or a United States Consul.
Sec. B-13. 4 MRSA §203 is amended to read:
§203. Rights of claimants under heir
Any person claiming under an heir at law has the same rights as the heir in all
proceedings in probate courts Probate Court, including rights of appeal.
Sec. B-14. 4 MRSA §251, as corrected by RR 2015, c. 2, §1, is further amended to
read:
§251. General jurisdiction
Each judge Probate Court may take the probate of wills and grant letters testamentary
or of administration on the estates of all deceased persons who, at the time of their death,
were inhabitants or residents of the judge's county in which the Probate Court is located or
who, not being residents of the State, died leaving an estate to be administered in the judge's
that county, or whose estate is afterwards found therein; and has jurisdiction of all matters
relating to the settlement of such estates. A judge may grant leave to adopt children, change
the names of persons, appoint guardians for minors and others according to law and has
jurisdiction as to persons under guardianship, and as to whatever else is conferred by law,
except in cases in which the District Court has jurisdiction over a child pursuant to section
152, subsection 5‑A. Except in cases in which the District Court has exclusive jurisdiction
over a child pursuant to section 152, subsection 5-A, each Probate Court has jurisdiction to
the extent authorized in Title 18-C over adoptions, name change petitions, guardianships,
conservatorships and other protective arrangements; has jurisdiction to the extent
authorized in Title 18-C as to persons under guardianship, conservatorship or other
protective arrangements; and has jurisdiction over any other matter as provided by law.
Sec. B-15. 4 MRSA §251-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 63, §2, is further amended
to read:
§251-A. Other proceedings involving parental rights; transfer to District Court
1. Disclosure of orders and proceedings. The judge of probate presiding over any
matter involving guardianship, adoption or change of name or another matter involving
Page 4 - 132LR1103(01)

413 custody or other parental rights with respect to a minor child Probate Court shall require
424 all parties in any matter involving guardianship, adoption or change of name or another
435 matter involving custody or other parental rights with respect to a minor child to disclose
446 whether they have knowledge of:
A. Any interim or final order then in effect concerning custody or other parental rights
with respect to the minor child, including any order of the District Court terminating
parental rights; appointing a guardian, including a permanency, emergency or interim
guardian; awarding parental rights to a 3rd party; or granting an adoption;
B. Any proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code brought against the minor child
pending in District Court or any proceeding involving custody or other parental rights
with respect to the minor child pending before any court of this State or another state,
including the District Court; or
C. Any other related action pending before any court of this State or another state,
including the District Court.
2. Transfer to District Court. Except as provided in subsection 3, if in a matter
before the Probate Court concerning a minor child a judge of probate Probate Court
becomes aware that a proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code brought against the minor
child or a proceeding involving custody or other parental rights with respect to the minor
child is pending in the District Court or that the minor child is or was the subject of a
District Court order terminating parental rights, appointing a guardian, including a
permanency, emergency or interim guardian, awarding parental rights to a 3rd party or
granting an adoption, the judge Probate Court shall notify the District Court and take
appropriate action to facilitate a transfer of the matter to the District Court. If a matter is
transferred to the District Court under this subsection, the District Court has continuing,
exclusive jurisdiction over the matter and over any future proceedings for guardianship,
adoption or change of name or other matter involving custody or other parental rights with
respect to the minor child brought under Title 18‑C, except to the extent that the District
Court's jurisdiction is precluded by the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act.
3. Exception to transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a
probate court the Probate Court shall retain jurisdiction over an action for guardianship,
adoption, change of name or other matter involving custody or other parental rights with
respect to a minor child brought under Title 18‑C that would otherwise be within the
exclusive, continuing jurisdiction of the District Court under section 152, subsection 5‑A
and may not transfer that matter to the District Court under subsection 2 if:
A. At the time the proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code or the proceeding
involving custody or other parental rights with respect to the minor child that would
otherwise trigger the District Court's continuing, exclusive jurisdiction is initiated, the
testimonial hearing on the Title 18‑C matter has concluded and the Probate Court has
that matter under advisement; and
B. The Probate Court has not determined that the District Court is the more appropriate
forum for the Title 18‑C proceeding.
Page 5 - 132LR1103(01)

For purposes of this section, a proceeding is pending if a complaint, petition or post-
judgment motion has been filed and the final judgment or final order on that complaint,
petition or post-judgment motion has not yet been issued.
Sec. B-16. 4 MRSA §252 is amended to read:
§252. Equity jurisdiction
The courts of probate shall have Probate Court has jurisdiction in equity, concurrent
with the Superior Court, of all cases and matters relating to the administration of the estates
of deceased persons, to wills and to trusts which that are created by will or other written
instrument. Such jurisdiction may be exercised upon complaint according to the usual
course of proceedings in civil actions in which equitable relief is sought.
Sec. B-17. 4 MRSA §253, as amended by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. C, §4 and affected
by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is further amended to read:
§253. Jurisdiction in court where proceedings originate
Subject to Title 18‑C, sections 1‑303 and, 3‑201, 5-106 and 9-104, and except as
otherwise provided in Title 18‑C, section 5‑105, when a case is originally within the
jurisdiction of the probate court Probate Court in 2 or more counties, the one that first
commences proceedings therein retains the same exclusively throughout. The jurisdiction
assumed in any case, except in cases of fraud, so far as it depends on the residence of any
person or the locality or amount of property, may not be contested in any proceeding
whatever, except on an appeal or removal from the probate court Probate Court in the
original case or when the want of jurisdiction appears on the same record.
Sec. B-18. 4 MRSA §301, as amended by PL 1995, c. 683, §1, is repealed.
Sec. B-19. 4 MRSA §301-A is enacted to read:
§301-A. Judges; election or appointment; term; qualifications; salary; expenses; full-
time duties
1. Election; term. Probate Court Judges are elected to the county Probate Courts
described in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph A as follows.
A. A county Probate Court Judge elected or appointed under the former Constitution
of Maine, Article VI, Section 6 may serve until the expiration of that judge's term of
office.
(1) A vacancy occurring during the term of a county Probate Court Judge elected
on November 8, 2022 due to the death, resignation, removal from the county or
permanent incapacity as defined in Title 30-A, section 1, subsection 2-A of the
judge may be filled by the Governor by appointment. In the case of a vacancy in
the term of a county Probate Court Judge who was nominated by primary election
before the general election, the individual appointed by the Governor to fill the
vacancy must be enrolled in the same political party as the judge whose term is
vacant. In making the appointment, the Governor shall choose from any
recommendations submitted to the Governor by the county committee of the
political party from which the appointment is to be made. The term of the
successor judge appointed by the Governor under this paragraph ends on December
31, 2026.
Page 6 - 132LR1103(01)

(2) A vacancy occurring before January 1, 2027 during the term of a county Probate
Court Judge elected on November 5, 2024 due to the death, resignation, removal
from the county or permanent incapacity as defined in Title 30-A, section 1,
subsection 2-A of the judge must be filled by election under paragraph B; in the
meantime, the Governor may fill such a vacancy by appointment. In the case of a
vacancy in the term of a county Probate Court Judge who was nominated by
primary election before the general election, the individual appointed by the
Governor to fill the vacancy must be enrolled in the same political party as the
judge whose term is vacant. In making the appointment, the Governor shall choose
from any recommendations submitted to the Governor by the county committee of
the political party from which the appointment is to be made. The term of the
successor judge appointed by the Governor under this paragraph ends on December
31, 2026.
(3) Vacancies occurring after January 1, 2027 during the term of any county
Probate Court Judge elected under the former Constitution of Maine, Article VI,
Section 6 due to the death, resignation, removal from the county or permanent
incapacity as defined in Title 30-A, section 1, subsection 2-A of the judge may not
be filled.
B. A county Probate Court Judge must be elected in Androscoggin, Franklin, Knox and
Penobscot counties, and in any county in which a vacancy described in paragraph A,
subparagraph (2) occurs, by a plurality of the votes cast in the respective county at an
election on the Tuesday following the first Monday of November in 2026. Each county
Probate Court Judge elected under this subsection has a term of office of 2 years,
commencing January 1, 2027. Vacancies occurring in offices governed by this
paragraph due to the death, resignation, removal from the county or permanent
incapacity as defined in Title 30-A, section 1, subsection 2-A of the county Probate
Court Judge may not be filled.
2. Appointment; term. Probate Court Judges are appointed to the state Probate Court
established in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph B as follows.
A. The Governor, subject to review by the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over judiciary matters and to confirmation by the Legislature, shall
appoint 4 judges for terms that commence no earlier than January 1, 2027. Each Probate
Court Judge appointed under this paragraph has a term of office of 7 years.
B. Beginning January 1, 2027, if the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court
determines that the number of Probate Court Judges appointed under paragraph A is
insufficient to provide for the efficient administration of justice in the Probate Court
established in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph B, the Chief Justice may request
that the Governor appoint an additional judge. Upon receipt of a request from the Chief
Justice under this paragraph, the Governor, subject to review by the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters and to
confirmation by the Legislature, may appoint an additional judge to the Probate Court
established in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph B. In no event may more than 9
Probate Court Judges be appointed to the Probate Court established in section 201-A,
subsection 2, paragraph B. Each Probate Court Judge appointed under this paragraph
has a term of office of 7 years.
Page 7 - 132LR1103(01)

3. Qualifications. To be eligible for election or appointment as a Probate Court Judge,
an individual must be a member of the bar of the State.
4. Salary; expenses. Each Probate Court Judge elected under subsection 1 or elected
or appointed under the former Constitution of Maine, Article VI, Section 6 is entitled to
receive an annual salary as established by the judge's county pursuant to Title 30-A, chapter
3 and the fees provided in section 304. Beginning January 1, 2027 and except as provided
in subsection 5 for the Chief Judge of the Probate Court, each Probate Court Judge
appointed under subsection 2 is entitled to receive a salary equivalent to the salary of an
Associate Judge of the District Court under section 157, subsections 4 and 4-A and to
reimbursement by the State for expenses to the same extent that a District Court Judge is
entitled to reimbursement by the State for expenses under section 157, subsection 5.
5. Designation of Chief Judge; salary; expenses. Beginning January 1, 2027, the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court shall designate one Probate Court Judge
appointed under subsection 2 as the Chief Judge of the Probate Court. The Chief Judge is
entitled to receive a salary equivalent to the salary of the Chief Judge of the District Court
under section 157, subsection 2 and to reimbursement by the State for expenses to the same
extent that a District Court Judge is entitled to reimbursement by the State for expenses
under section 157, subsection 5.
6. Full-time duties. Beginning January 1, 2027, a Probate Court Judge appointed
under subsection 2 shall devote full time to that Probate Court Judge's judicial duties.
During that Probate Court Judge's term of office, that judge may not practice law or be the
partner or associate of any person in the practice of law.
7. Exception. Subsection 6 does not apply to a county Probate Court Judge elected
under subsection 1 or elected or appointed under the former Constitution of Maine, Article
VI, Section 6.
Sec. B-20. 4 MRSA §302, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §8, is amended to
read:
§302. Officers execute processes and attend courts
Sheriffs, their deputies and constables shall execute all legal processes directed to them
by any such judge of probate a Probate Court Judge, who may, when necessary, require
such officer, when not in attendance upon any other court, to attend during the sitting of
the probate court Probate Court, for which that officer must be paid as in other courts for
similar services.
Sec. B-21. 4 MRSA §303, as amended by PL 1965, c. 238, is further amended to
read:
§303. Continuous session; return day for matters requiring public notice
The Probate court Court shall always be open in each county for all matters over which
it has jurisdiction, except upon days on which by law no court is held, but it shall have
certain fixed days and places to be made known by public notification thereof in their
respective counties to which all matters requiring public notice shall must be made
returnable, except as otherwise ordered by the judge Probate Court Judge. In case of the
absence of the judge or vacancy in the office at the time of holding any court, the register
Page 8 - 132LR1103(01)

413 Register of Probate or acting register may adjourn the same until the judge can attend or
424 some other probate judge another Probate Court Judge can be notified and attend.
Sec. B-22. 4 MRSA §304, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §9, is amended to
read:
§304. Equity and contested cases; time and place of hearing
Judges of probate The Probate Court may hold hearings for matters in equity and
contested cases at such time and place in the county as the judge of probate Probate Court
may appoint and make all necessary orders and decrees relating thereto, and when hearings
are held at other places than those fixed for holding the regular terms of court, the judge is
allowed, in addition to that judge's regular salary, $5 per day and actual expenses, which
must be paid by the State unless otherwise provided by law.
When a Probate Court in a county described in section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph
A holds a hearing in a place other than the place fixed for holding the regular terms of the
court, the Probate Court Judge is allowed, in addition to that judge's regular salary, $5 per
day and actual expenses, which must be paid by the State unless otherwise provided by
law.
Sec. B-23. 4 MRSA §305, as repealed and replaced by PL 1979, c. 41, is amended
to read:
§305. Term of Fort Kent and Caribou probate court
The judge of probate Probate Court in and for the County of Aroostook shall hold a
court of probate at least twice in each year at Fort Kent and at least 4 times each year at
Caribou in the county. The time for holding the court shall must be appointed by the judge
and made known by public notification as provided in section 303.
Sec. B-24. 4 MRSA §306, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §10, is amended to
read:
§306. Interchange of judicial duties; expenses
During the With respect to a Probate Court Judge in a county described in section
201-A, subsection 1, paragraph A, during a period of sickness, or absence from the State
or inability of any the judge of probate to hold the regular terms of that judge's court, such
the terms, at the judge's request or that of the register Register of Probate of the county,
may be held by the judge of any other county any other Probate Court Judge. The judges
Probate Court Judges in counties described in section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph A
may interchange service or perform each others' other's duties when they find it necessary
or convenient, and in case of a vacancy in the office of a judge, all necessary terms of the
probate court for the county may, at the request of the register, be held by the judge of
another county until the vacancy is filled. The orders, decrees and decisions of the judge
Probate Court Judge holding such terms have the same force and validity as if made by the
judge Probate Court Judge of the county in which such terms are held.
When any judge of probate Probate Court Judge in a county described in section 201-A,
subsection 1, paragraph A holds court or a hearing in any probate matter, or in equity, in
any county other than the one in which that judge resides, that judge must be reimbursed
by the county in which such court or hearing is held for that judge's expenses actually and
Page 9 - 132LR1103(01)

413 reasonably incurred, upon presentation to the county commissioners of that county of a
424 detailed statement of such expenses.
Sec. B-25. 4 MRSA §307, as amended by PL 2023, c. 4, §1, is further amended to
read:
§307. Conflict of interest; transfer of case
When a judge Probate Court Judge or register Register of probate Probate is interested
in that judge's or register of probate's register's own right, trust, or in any other manner, or
is within the degree of kindred, by which in law that judge or register of probate may, by
possibility, be heir to any part of the estate of the person deceased, or is named as executor,
trustee or guardian of minor children in the will of any deceased resident of the county,
such estate must be settled in the probate court Probate Court of any adjoining county,
which has as full jurisdiction thereof as if the deceased had died in that adjoining county.
If the judge's or register of probate's register's interest arises after jurisdiction of such estate
has been regularly assumed or existed at the time of the judge's or register of probate's
register's appointment to office, and in all cases where when an executor, administrator,
guardian or trustee, whose trust is not fully executed, becomes judge or register of probate
for the county in which that judge's or register of probate's register's letters were granted,
further proceedings in that county must be transferred to the probate court Probate Court
in any adjoining county and there remain until completed, as if such court had had original
jurisdiction thereof, unless said disability is removed before that time. Whenever in any
case under this section the disability of the judge or register is removed before the
proceedings have been fully completed, the proceedings must then be transferred to the
probate court Probate Court in the county of original jurisdiction or to the probate court
Probate Court that otherwise would have had jurisdiction. In all such cases the register in
such adjoining county shall transmit copies of all records relating to such estate to the
probate office of the county where such estate belongs, to be there recorded. If there are
fewer than 4 counties adjoining the county of a probate court the Probate Court that is
required to transfer proceedings to an adjoining county under this section, the proceedings
must be transferred to a probate court the Probate Court in one of the 4 counties nearest to
the transferring probate court Probate Court, as measured by the shortest distance along
paved roads between the building in which the registry of probate is located in the
transferring county and the building in which the registry of probate is located in the other
county.
This section may not be construed to require removal to another county by reason of
the judge Probate Court Judge or register Register of probate Probate having been named
as executor, trustee or guardian of minor children in a will, as long as the judge or register
of probate does not receive a benefit from the will and the record of the court discloses the
filing of the judge's or register of probate's register's declination to act as such executor,
trustee or guardian, if no objection is raised by any interested party at the hearing on the
petition for probate of the will.
A judge Probate Court Judge in a county described in section 201-A, subsection 1,
paragraph A is considered to be interested in an estate or other probate proceeding,
including adoptions, if the judge or a person with whom the judge practices law represents
a party in the proceeding. When such representation begins, the judge shall transfer the
matter as provided in this section, after which transfer the judge or the person with whom
Page 10 - 132LR1103(01)

416 the judge practices law may continue such representation, except that, after a formal
427 probate proceeding has been initiated before a judge, that judge is forever barred from
438 assuming representation of a party in that same proceeding without regard to whether or
449 not the proceeding has been transferred. A petition requesting a transfer and the petition
550 related to the matter being transferred filed simultaneously are not considered formal
561 probate proceedings for the purposes of this paragraph.
Sec. B-26. 4 MRSA §308, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §12, is amended to
read:
§308. Certification of unfinished acts of predecessor judge
Every judge Probate Court Judge in a county described in section 201-A, subsection 1,
paragraph A, upon entering on the duties of that judge's office, shall examine the records,
decrees, certificates and all proceedings connected therewith that the judge's predecessor
left unsigned or unauthenticated. If the judge finds them correct, the judge shall sign and
authenticate them and they are then as valid to all intents and purposes as if such duty had
been done by the judge's predecessor while in office.
Sec. B-27. 4 MRSA §309, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §13, is amended to
read:
§309. Judge not to counsel or draft documents
A judge of probate Probate Court Judge may not have a voice in judging and
determining or be attorney or counselor in or out of court in any civil action or matter that
depends on or relates to any sentence or decree made by that judge of probate in that judge
of probate's judge's office, or in any civil action for or against any executor, administrator,
guardian or trustee under any last will and testament, as such, within that judge of probate's
judge's county. Any process or proceeding commenced by a judge of probate Probate Court
Judge in the probate court for that judge of probate's county Probate Court in violation of
this section is void, and that judge of probate is liable to the party injured in damages. A
judge of probate Probate Court Judge may not draft or aid in drafting any document or
paper that the judge of probate is by law required to pass upon.
Sec. B-28. 4 MRSA §310 is amended to read:
§310. Perpetual care of cemetery lots by order
Judges of probate, in In any case in which an estate is under their the Probate Court's
jurisdiction for probate, shall have the power to the Probate Court exercising jurisdiction
over the estate may order that an appropriate amount out of the estate be set aside for
perpetual care and suitable memorials for the cemetery lot in which the deceased is buried,
and to order special care of such lots when the conditions and size of the estate seem to
warrant such order.
Sec. B-29. 4 MRSA §311, as enacted by PL 1969, c. 434, is amended to read:
§311. Contracts for support
All contracts for support for life shall must be approved by the Probate Court in the
county in which the support for life is to be rendered. The Probate Court shall grant
approval after such reasonable notice as the court shall determine determines to be
Page 11 - 132LR1103(01)

412 appropriate, if the court shall find finds, after hearing, that the contract is just and equitable
423 under all of the circumstances.
A contract or agreement for support for life without such Probate Court approval shall
may not be received in evidence unless the person offering the contract or agreement shall
establish establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the contract or agreement is
just and equitable under all of the circumstances.
This section shall does not apply to such contracts or agreements for support for life
between persons related within the 3rd degree.
Sec. B-30. 4 MRSA §312, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 695, §1, is amended to read:
§312. Political activities of judges of probate
As a candidate for the elective office of judge of probate Probate Court Judge or as an
elected judge Probate Court Judge in a county described in section 201-A, subsection 1,
paragraph A, a person seeking or holding the office of judge of probate Probate Court Judge
in a county described in section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph A may engage in any
political activity that would be lawful for a candidate for any other elected county office or
for an incumbent elected county official. Any such judge may hold any other elected office
or offices not made incompatible by the Constitution of Maine.
This section does not apply to a Probate Court Judge appointed under section 301-A,
subsection 2.
Sec. B-31. 4 MRSA c. 7, sub-c. 4, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. B-32. 4 MRSA §567, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §17, is amended to
read:
§567. No recording officer to be attorney or sue in own court nor draft nor aid in
drafting paper to be recorded
A clerk, register as defined in Title 18-C, section 1-201, subsection 48 or recording
officer of any court of the State may not be attorney or counselor in any civil action or
matter pending in that court; neither may that person commence actions to be entered
therein, or draft or aid in drafting any document or paper that that person is by law required
to record, in full or in part. Violation of this section is a civil violation for which a fine not
to exceed $100 may be adjudged. Notwithstanding provisions of this section, clerks may
aid litigants in the preparation of small claims filings and registers may provide the
assistance described in Title 18-C, section 1-510, subsection 2. Nothing prevents the clerk
from rendering assistance of a general nature to the bar or the public.
Sec. B-33. 4 MRSA §751, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §19, is amended to
read:
§751. Duties of reporters
The judge of any court of probate or court of insolvency Probate Court may appoint a
reporter to report the proceedings at any hearing or examination in that judge's court,
whenever that judge the court considers it necessary or advisable. Such reporter must be
sworn to a faithful discharge of that reporter's duty and, under the direction of the judge,
shall take full notes of all oral testimony at such hearing or examination and such other
proceedings at such hearing or examination as the judge directs; and when required by the
Page 12 - 132LR1103(01)

413 judge shall furnish for the files of the court a correct typewritten transcript of that reporter's
424 notes of the oral testimony of any person testifying at such hearing or submitting to such
435 examination, and in making that transcript the reporter shall transcribe that reporter's notes
446 in full by questions and answers.
Sec. B-34. 4 MRSA §752, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §20, is amended to
read:
§752. Reading and signing transcript of testimony
In cases when the person testifying or submitting to examination is required by law to
sign that person's testimony or examination, the transcript made as provided in section 751
must be read to the person whose testimony or examination it is, at a time and place to be
appointed by the judge Probate Court, unless such person or that person's counsel in writing
waives such reading. If it is found to be accurate, or if it contains errors or mistakes or
alleged errors or mistakes and such errors or mistakes are either corrected or the
proceedings had in relation to the same as provided, such transcript must be signed by the
person whose testimony or examination it is. When the reading of a transcript is waived as
provided by this section, such transcript must be considered correct. In all other cases the
transcript need not be signed but must be considered to be complete and correct without
signing and has the same effect as if signed.
Sec. B-35. 4 MRSA §754, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §21, is amended to
read:
§754. Correction of mistakes in transcript
Manifest errors or mistakes in any transcript may be corrected, under the direction of
the judge Probate Court, according to the facts. When an error or mistake is alleged by the
party conducting the hearing or examination or by that party's counsel, or by the person
testifying or submitting to examination or by that person's counsel, and those parties cannot
agree whether or not there is such an error or mistake as alleged, or what correction should
be made, the judge shall decide whether or not such an error or mistake exists, and may
allow or disallow a correction according as the judge may find the fact. In such case the
judge shall annex to the transcript a certificate signed by the judge stating the alleged error
or mistake and by whom alleged, and the correction allowed or disallowed. In case such
parties mutually agree that there is an error or mistake in the transcript, and in like manner
agree what the correction should be, the transcript may be corrected according to such
agreement, but such correction must be stated and made in the presence of the judge.
Changes or alterations may not be made in any transcript except in the presence of the
judge or the person appointed by the judge to take the examination.
Sec. B-36. 4 MRSA §755 is amended to read:
§755. Appointment of reporter by judge court
When an examination is taken before some a person appointed by the judge Probate
Court to take it, the judge court may appoint a reporter to attend such examination for the
purposes mentioned in section 751, and the duties of such reporter shall be are the same as
in examinations before the judge Probate Court Judge. The powers and duties of any person
appointed by the judge court to take an examination shall be are the same at such
examination as those of the judge, and the same proceedings for the correction or alteration
of transcripts may be had before such person as before the judge.
Page 13 - 132LR1103(01)

Sec. B-37. 4 MRSA §756 is amended to read:
§756. Transcripts deemed original papers
All transcripts made and signed as provided shall be in this subchapter are deemed
original papers.
Sec. B-38. 4 MRSA §757 is enacted to read:
§757. Applicability; repeal
1. Applicability. This subchapter applies to the Probate Court in each county
described in section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph A and does not apply to the state
Probate Court established in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph B.
2. Repeal. This subchapter is repealed January 1, 2029.
Sec. B-39. 18-C MRSA §1-201, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
8. Court. "Court" Prior to January 1, 2029, "court" means any one of the several
courts of probate of this State established as provided in Title 4, sections 201 and 202
section 201-A, subsection 2.
This subsection is repealed January 1, 2029.
Sec. B-40. 18-C MRSA §1-303, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
§1-303. Venue; multiple proceedings; transfer
1. Court in county where proceeding first commenced. If a proceeding under this
Code could be maintained in more than one court county in this State, the court located in
the county in which the proceeding is first commenced has the exclusive right to proceed.
2. Multiple proceedings. If proceedings concerning the same estate, protected person,
ward or trust are commenced in more than one court courts located in more than one county
of this State, the court located in the county in which the proceeding was first commenced
shall continue to hear the matter, and the other courts located in the other counties shall
hold the matter in abeyance until the question of venue is decided. If the ruling court
determines that venue is properly in another court, it shall transfer the proceeding to the
other court.
3. Transfer in the interest of justice. If a court finds that in the interest of justice a
proceeding or a file should be located in transferred to the court located in another court
county of this State, the court making the finding may transfer the proceeding or file to the
other court in the other county.
Sec. B-41. 18-C MRSA §1-309, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
§1-309. Judges
A judge of the court must be chosen and shall serve as provided in Title 4, sections 301
301-A to 312.
This section is repealed January 1, 2029.
Page 14 - 132LR1103(01)

Sec. B-42. 18-C MRSA §1-501, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
§1-501. Election; bond; vacancies; salaries; copies; term
1. Election. Registers of probate are The Register of Probate in each county is elected
or appointed as provided in the Constitution of Maine by a plurality of the votes cast in the
respective county at the election on the Tuesday following the first Monday of November
in the even-numbered year next preceding the expiration of the term of the incumbent
register. The register shall hold office for 4 years, commencing on January 1st following
the register's election. A Except to the extent inconsistent with this section, a register's
election is effected and determined as is provided for county commissioners by Title 30‑A,
chapter 1, subchapter 2, and a register's term commences on the first day of January
following the register's election, except that the term of a register appointed to fill a vacancy
commences immediately.
2. Bond. A register Register of Probate, before acting, shall give bond to the treasurer
of the register's county with sufficient sureties in the sum of $2,500, except that this sum
must be $10,000 for Cumberland County. A The register, having executed the bond, shall
file the bond in the office of the county commissioners of the register's county, to be
presented to the county commissioners at the next meeting for approval. After the bond is
approved, the county commissioners shall retain a copy of the bond and deliver the original
bond to the register, who shall deliver the original bond to the treasurer of the county within
10 days after the bond's approval. Surety and fidelity insurance coverage provided by a
public sector self-funded risk pool organized pursuant to Title 30‑A, section 2253 in the
sum ordered by the commissioners is deemed to comply with the requirements of this
section.
3. Vacancies. Vacancies A vacancy caused by a Register of Probate's death,
resignation, removal from the county, permanent incapacity as defined in Title 30‑A,
section 1, subsection 2-A or any other reason must be filled as provided in the Constitution
of Maine by a plurality of the votes cast in the affected county at the next general election.
The term of a register elected to fill a vacancy is 4 years, commencing on January 1st
following the election. In the meantime, the Governor may fill such vacancy by
appointment, and the register so appointed shall take office immediately and shall hold
office until the commencement of the term of the successor elected to fill the vacancy under
this subsection. In the case of a vacancy in the term of a register who was nominated by
primary election before the general election, the register appointed by the Governor to fill
the vacancy until a successor is chosen at election must be enrolled in the same political
party as the register whose term is vacant. In making the appointment, the Governor shall
choose from any recommendations submitted to the Governor by the county committee of
the political party from which the appointment is to be made.
4. Salary. A register is entitled to receive an annual salary as established by the
register's county pursuant to Title 30‑A, chapter 3. The salary of the register must be in
full compensation for the performance of all duties required of the register.
5. Copies and fees. Registers may make copies of wills, accounts, inventories,
petitions and decrees and furnish the copies to the persons requesting the copies and may
charge a reasonable fee for that service, which is considered a fee for the use of the county.
Fees for exemplified copies of the records of the probate of wills and the granting of
Page 15 - 132LR1103(01)

416 administrations, guardianships and conservatorships; fees for copies of petitions and orders
427 of notice for personal service; fees for appeal copies; and the statutory fees for abstracts
438 and copies of the waivers of wills and other copies required to be recorded in the registry
449 of deeds are considered official fees for the use of the county. This subsection may not be
550 construed to change or repeal any provisions of law requiring the furnishing of certain
561 copies without charge.
Sec. B-43. 18-C MRSA §1-510, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt.
A, §2 and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
A. Be an attorney or counselor in or out of court in an action or matter pending in the
court of located in the county in which the register is register or in an appeal in such
action or matter;
Sec. B-44. 18-C MRSA §1-510, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt.
A, §2 and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
B. Be an administrator, guardian, commissioner of insolvency, appraiser or divider of
an estate, in a case within the jurisdiction of the court of located in the county in which
the register is register, except as provided in Title 4, section 307, or be in any manner
interested in the fees and emoluments arising from such an estate in that capacity; or.
This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2029; or
Sec. B-45. 18-C MRSA §1-510, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
2. Assistance in drafting. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a register may
not draft or aid in drafting documents or paper that the register is by law required to record
in full or in part. A register may aid in drafting applications in informal proceedings,
petitions or sworn statements relating to the closing of decedents' estates that have not been
contested prior to closing, applications for change of name and petitions for guardians of
minors. A register or an employee of a court may not charge fees or accept anything of
value for assisting in the drafting of documents to be used or filed in the court of located in
the county in which the person is the register or an employee.
Sec. B-46. 18-C MRSA §1-511, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended by enacting a new first paragraph to
read:
Each county shall provide all necessary printed blanks and record books for the court
located in that county, and the record books may be printed to correspond with the printed
blanks.
PART C
Sec. C-1. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1983, c. 269, §§1 and 9, is
further amended to read:
2. Examine the status of dockets. Examine the status of dockets of all courts so as
to determine cases and other judicial business that have been unduly delayed. From such
reports, the administrator shall indicate which courts are in need of additional judicial
personnel and make recommendations to the Chief Justice, to the Chief Justice of the
Superior Court and, to the Chief Judge of the District Court and to the Chief Judge of the
Page 16 - 132LR1103(01)

413 Probate Court concerning the assignment or reassignment of personnel to courts that are in
424 need of such personnel. The administrator shall also carry out the directives of the Chief
435 Justice as to the assignment of personnel in these instances;
Sec. C-2. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§5, as amended by PL 1983, c. 269, §§2 and 9, is
further amended to read:
5. Prescribe uniform administrative and business methods, etc. Prescribe uniform
administrative and business methods, systems, forms, docketing and records to be used in
the Supreme Judicial Court, in the Superior Court and, in the District Court and in the
Probate Court;
Sec. C-3. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§7, ¶D, as amended by PL 1997, c. 24, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended to read:
D. Collects statistical and other data and makes reports to the Chief Justice, to the
Chief Justice of the Superior Court and, to the Chief Judge of the District Court and to
the Chief Judge of the Probate Court relating to the expenditures of public money for
the maintenance and operation of the Judicial Department;
Sec. C-4. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§7, ¶E, as amended by PL 1997, c. 24, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended to read:
E. Develops and implements a uniform set of accounting and budgetary accounts,
based on generally accepted fiscal and accounting procedures, for the Supreme Judicial
Court, for the Superior Court and, for the District Court and for the Probate Court; and
Sec. C-5. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§17, as amended by PL 2021, c. 684, §2, is further
amended to read:
17. Statement of fiscal effect on judicial system. Apply the following requirements
when the State Court Administrator prepares statements pertaining to the impact that
executive orders and proposed legislation have upon judicial system resources, including
the cost or savings to the judicial system. The State Court Administrator, in preparing such
impact statements, shall make inquiry of the Chief Justice of the Superior Court, the Chief
Judge of the District Court, the Chief Judge of the Probate Court, a statewide association
of prosecuting attorneys, a statewide association of criminal defense attorneys, a statewide
association of trial attorneys and any other parties, as appropriate, in order to provide the
most accurate estimate of the judicial branch impact of such legislation, by fiscal year.
A. The State Court Administrator shall furnish the statements to the legislative staff
office designated to collect and assemble fiscal information for use of legislative
committees under Title 3, section 163‑A, subsection 10 and to:
(1) The Governor for judicial impact statements on executive orders; and
(2) The appropriate committee of the Legislature for the information of its
members for proposed legislation.
B. The statement on a particular executive order prepared by the State Court
Administrator must be included in the executive order if the executive order has a fiscal
impact on the judicial system, as determined by the State Court Administrator.
C. The statement on proposed legislation prepared by the State Court Administrator
must be considered in the preparation of the fiscal note included in a committee
Page 17 - 132LR1103(01)

413 amendment or other amendment if the legislation or amendment has a fiscal impact on
424 the judicial system, as determined by the State Court Administrator; and
Sec. C-6. 4 MRSA §17-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. YYYY, §1,
is further amended to read:
1. Informational publications and record searches. The Except as provided in Title
18-C, section 1-511, the State Court Administrator may establish a fee schedule to cover
the cost of printing and distribution of publications and forms, the procedures for the sale
of these publications and forms and record searches performed by Judicial Department
employees.
Sec. C-7. 4 MRSA §18-A, sub-§3-A, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 509, §2, is
further amended to read:
A. For all fees collected by the Judicial Department after October 1, 2019, 9% must
be deposited in the fund. This paragraph does not apply to fees imposed by the Probate
Court or to fees dedicated under section 17‑A or section 18‑B, subsection 8 or to
surcharges imposed pursuant to paragraph C.
Sec. C-8. 4 MRSA §18-A, sub-§3-A, ¶B, as amended by PL 2005, c. 361, §3, is
further amended to read:
B. A surcharge of $10 must be imposed by a court on each civil fine, or penalty or
forfeiture imposed by the court and deposited in the fund. This paragraph does not
apply to civil fines or penalties imposed by the Probate Court.
Sec. C-9. 4 MRSA §18-B, sub-§6, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. The Chief Judge of the Probate Court or a designee;
Sec. C-10. 4 MRSA §18-B, sub-§6, ¶F, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 560, Pt. I, §3,
is amended to read:
F. A Judge of the District Court, who is appointed by and serves at the pleasure of the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court; and
Sec. C-11. 4 MRSA §18-B, sub-§6, ¶F-1 is enacted to read:
F-1. A Probate Court Judge, who is appointed by and serves at the pleasure of the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court; and
Sec. C-12. 4 MRSA §24, first ¶, as amended by PL 1993, c. 675, Pt. C, §10, is
further amended to read:
The State Court Administrator shall, subject to the approval of the Chief Justice,
prepare biennially a consolidated operating budget for all courts in the State to be known
as the Judicial Department operating budget. The Judicial Department operating budget
may not include expenses related to the operation of county registries of probate or revenue
from fees, fines or penalties collected by the Probate Court and allocated to the county
pursuant to Title 18-C, sections 1-501, 1-511, 1-603 and 1-607 or any other provision of
law. The administrator may be assisted in this task by the Chief Justice of the Superior
Court and, the Chief Judge of the District Court and the Chief Judge of the Probate Court.
Sec. C-13. 4 MRSA §115, first ¶, as corrected by RR 2009, c. 1, §4, is amended
to read:
Page 18 - 132LR1103(01)

In Except as provided in section 301-C, in each county, the place for holding court is
located in a building designated by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court or the
Chief Justice's designee, who, with the advice and approval of the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services, is empowered to
negotiate, on behalf of the State, the leases, contracts and other arrangements the Chief
Justice considers necessary, within the limits of appropriations and other funds available to
the Supreme Judicial, Superior and District Courts, to provide suitable quarters, adequately
furnished and equipped, for the Supreme Judicial, Superior or District Court in each county.
The county commissioners in each county shall continue to provide for the use of the
Supreme Judicial, Superior and District Courts such quarters, facilities, furnishings and
equipment in existing county buildings as were in use by the Supreme Judicial and Superior
Courts on January 1, 1976, without charge. The county commissioners are not required to
provide without charge those quarters, facilities, furnishings and equipment in existing
county buildings that were in use by the District Courts and were subject to a charge prior
to January 1, 1976.
Sec. C-14. 4 MRSA §301-B is enacted to read:
§301-B. Duties of Chief Judge
The Chief Judge of the Probate Court is responsible to and under the supervision of the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court for the operation of the Probate Court and shall
serve as Chief Judge at the pleasure of the Chief Justice. The Chief Judge shall:
1. Hold court when necessary. Hold court in any county described in section 201-A,
subsection 1, paragraph B when the Chief Judge determines it necessary by reason of
illness, absence or disability of the Probate Court Judge regularly assigned or by reason of
an excessive case load in any county;
2. Assign judges. Assign Probate Court Judges to hold court in any county described
in section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph B where, in the judgment of the Chief Judge,
they are needed;
3. Days and hours for holding court. Subject to the requirements of section 305, fix
the days and hours for holding court in each county described in section 201-A, subsection
1, paragraph B and provide public notification of such days and hours as provided in section
303;
4. Vacations. Determine the time for the taking of vacations by each Probate Court
Judge appointed under section 301-A, subsection 2;
5. Records and reports. Prescribe, subject to the approval of the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Judicial Court or the Chief Justice’s designee, the records to be kept and destroyed
and the reports to be made by each Probate Court Judge appointed under section 301-A,
subsection 2;
6. Statistics. Collect such statistics and other information pertaining to the business of
the Probate Court as are requested by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court or
the Chief Justice’s designee;
7. Budget. Utilizing such assistance from the Administrative Office of the Courts as
the Chief Judge may request, prepare and submit a proposed annual budget for the Probate
Court established in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph B to the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Judicial Court or the Chief Justice’s designee. The proposed annual budget for
Page 19 - 132LR1103(01)

415 the Probate Court may not include expenses related to the operation of county registries of
426 probate or revenue from fees, fines or penalties collected by the Probate Court and allocated
437 to the county pursuant to Title 18-C, sections 1-501, 1-511, 1-603 and 1-607 or any other
448 provision of law;
8. Report. Render to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court an annual report
on the state of business in the Probate Court and on the conferences held pursuant to
subsection 10;
9. Courtroom facilities. Pursuant to section 301-C, make necessary arrangements for
safe and accessible courtroom facilities in each county described in section 201-A,
subsection 1, paragraph B; establish headquarters with appropriate facilities for the Chief
Judge; and establish quarters and facilities for each Probate Court Judge appointed under
section 301-A, subsection 2;
10. Conference of judges. Convene at least once annually at such place as the Chief
Judge considers appropriate a conference of Probate Court Judges appointed under section
301-A, subsection 2 to consider and take action upon or make recommendations with
respect to current problems in the operation of the Probate Court. The Chief Judge shall
invite any county Probate Court Judge elected under section 301-A, subsection 1 whose
term has not yet expired to attend the conference. The expenses of Probate Court Judges
appointed under section 301-A, subsection 2 attending this conference are an expense of
the Probate Court established in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph B;
11. Development and implementation of administrative concepts. Carry on a
continuous survey and study of the organization, operation, condition of business, practice
and procedure of the Probate Court and make recommendations to the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Judicial Court concerning the number of judges and other personnel, other than
personnel in the county registries of probate, required for the efficient administration of
justice and examine, with the advice of the Probate Court Judges and Registers of Probate,
the status of dockets of the various Probate Courts to determine whether the business of the
court is being carried out in an efficient manner and that emergency matters are prioritized
and addressed expediently. From such an examination, the Chief Judge shall annually
make recommendations to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court for guidelines
and policies for the scheduling and trial of matters before the Probate Court. In providing
recommendations, the Chief Judge shall give due and appropriate regard to the
recommendations of the Probate Court Judges and the Registers of Probate and shall
provide a mechanism whereby their individual recommendations and comments may be
brought to the attention of the Chief Justice. The Chief Judge, in advising as to the
appropriateness of the methods or systems for scheduling trials and the management of
matters before the Probate Court, shall take into consideration systems and methods
operational in the Superior Court and the District Court. The final decision as to the
management of judicial branch personnel and the implementation of guidelines, policies
and procedures for the scheduling of trials and management of matters before the Probate
Court must be made by the Chief Justice only after consultation with the Chief Judge; and
12. Other duties. Perform such additional duties as may be assigned by the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court.
Sec. C-15. 4 MRSA §301-C is enacted to read:
§301-C. Place for holding court
Page 20 - 132LR1103(01)

1. Place for holding court. Except as otherwise required in section 305, in each county
described in section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph B, the Chief Judge of the Probate Court
shall designate a place for holding court that is located, to the extent possible given the
other requirements of this subsection, in the building holding the office of that county’s
Register of Probate. The Chief Judge, with the advice and approval of the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services, is empowered to
negotiate on behalf of the State the leases, contracts and other arrangements the Chief Judge
considers necessary, within the limits of the budget and funds available, to provide suitable
quarters, adequately furnished and equipped for the Probate Court in each county.
If the Chief Judge is unable to negotiate the leases, contracts and other arrangements as
provided in this subsection, the Chief Judge may, with the advice and approval of the
Bureau of General Services, negotiate on behalf of the State the leases, contracts and other
arrangements the Chief Judge considers necessary, within the limits of the budget and funds
available, to provide suitable quarters, adequately furnished and equipped for the Probate
Court in other publicly owned or privately owned buildings.
2. Use of Superior Court and District Court facilities. The facilities of the Superior
Court and the facilities of the District Court in each county when the court is not in session
must be available for use by the Probate Court in that county. Arrangements for such use
must be made by the Chief Judge of the Probate Court.
Sec. C-16. 4 MRSA §1201, sub-§12, as amended by PL 2001, c. 12, §1, is further
amended to read:
12. Judge. "Judge" means a Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court or the Superior
Court, any Judge of the District Court, any Probate Court Judge appointed pursuant to
section 301-A, subsection 2, any Administrative Court Judge or any Associate
Administrative Court Judge who is actively serving as of December 1, 1984, or who is
appointed subsequent to December 1, 1984, but does not include Active Retired Judges.
This subsection is repealed January 1, 2029.
Sec. C-17. 4 MRSA §1552, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 406, §1, is amended
to read:
1. Guardian ad litem roster. The division shall assist the Chief Judge of the District
Court and the Chief Judge of the Probate Court in the establishment and maintenance of a
roster of guardians ad litem pursuant to section 1553.
Sec. C-18. 4 MRSA §1552, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 406, §1, is amended
to read:
2. Administration of guardians ad litem under Title Titles 18-C and 19-A. For
guardians ad litem appointed under Title Titles 18-C and 19‑A, the division shall assist the
Chief Judge of the District Court and the Chief Judge of the Probate Court in:
A. Establishing standardized billing, itemization requirements and time reporting
processes for all guardians ad litem;
B. Establishing guidelines for preparation of required reports; and
C. Collecting, maintaining and reporting data about orders of appointment, submission
of required reports, caseloads and other information as directed by the Chief Judge of
the District Court or the Chief Judge of the Probate Court.
Page 21 - 132LR1103(01)

Sec. C-19. 4 MRSA §1555, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 406, §1, is amended
to read:
3. Payment for services; fees and billing; enforcement. The Except as otherwise
provided in Title 18-C, section 9-204, subsection 4, the order under subsection 2 must
specify that payment for the services of the guardian ad litem is the responsibility of the
parties, with the terms of payment specified in the order.
A. The fee arrangements in the order must specify hourly rates or a flat fee, the timing
of payments to be made and by whom and the maximum amount of fees that may be
charged for the case without further order of the court. If the payments ordered to be
made before the guardian ad litem commences the investigation, if any, are not paid as
ordered, the guardian ad litem shall notify the court, and the court may vacate the
appointment order or take such other action it determines appropriate under the
circumstances.
B. In determining the responsibility for payment, the court shall consider:
(1) The income of the parties;
(2) The marital and nonmarital assets of the parties;
(3) The division of property made or anticipated as part of the final divorce or
separation;
(4) Which party requested appointment of a guardian ad litem; and
(5) Other factors considered relevant by the court, which must be stated with
specificity in the appointment order.
C. The guardian ad litem shall use standardized billing, itemization requirements and
time reporting processes as established by the division. The guardian ad litem may
collect fees, if a collection action is necessary, pursuant to Title 14 and may not pursue
collection in the action in which the guardian ad litem is appointed.
Sec. C-20. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§4, ¶C, as amended by PL 2019, c. 427, §1, is
further amended to read:
C. Juvenile defendants; and
Sec. C-21. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§4, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. In a guardianship, conservatorship or other protective arrangement proceeding,
an indigent adult or minor respondent for whom counsel was appointed at public
expense pursuant to Title 18-C, section 5-205, subsection 5; Title 18-C, section 5-210,
subsection 7; Title 18-C, section 5-305, subsection 3; Title 18-C, section 5-406,
subsection 1; or Title 18-C, section 5-507, subsection 1;
Sec. C-22. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§4, ¶C-2 is enacted to read:
C-2. In a guardianship, conservatorship or other protective arrangement proceeding
involving a minor respondent, an indigent parent, guardian or petitioner for whom
counsel was appointed at public expense pursuant to Title 18-C, section 5-205,
subsection 4; Title 18-C, section 5-210, subsection 7; Title 18-C, section 5-406,
subsection 3; or Title 18-C, section 5-507, subsection 3;
Sec. C-23. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§4, ¶C-3 is enacted to read:
Page 22 - 132LR1103(01)

C-3. An indigent parent in an adoption proceeding for whom counsel was appointed
at public expense pursuant to Title 18-C, section 9-106 or an indigent parent or minor
adoptee in a proceeding for annulment of an adoption decree for whom counsel was
appointed at public expense pursuant to Title 18-C, section 9-315, subsection 1,
paragraph A; and
Sec. C-24. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§4, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 427, §2, is
amended to read:
D. An indigent defendant or party or a juvenile for the purpose of filing, on behalf of
that indigent defendant or party or juvenile, a petition for certiorari to the Supreme
Court of the United States from an adverse decision of the Law Court on a case for
which services were previously provided to that defendant or party or juvenile pursuant
to paragraph A, B or, C, C-1, C-2 or C-3.
Sec. C-25. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Register. "Register" has the same meaning as in Title 18-C, section 1-201,
subsection 48.
Sec. C-26. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶D, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c.
638, §9, is amended to read:
D. To ensure an adequate pool of qualified attorneys, develop training and evaluation
programs for attorneys throughout the State to provide representation in criminal,
juvenile, child protective, adoption, guardianship, conservatorship, other protective
arrangements, involuntary commitment and all other types of proceedings for which
parties may be eligible to receive indigent legal services;
Sec. C-27. 4 MRSA §1806, sub-§3, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
3. Confidential information disclosed by Judicial Department and registers. The
Judicial Department and registers may disclose to the commission confidential information
necessary for the commission to carry out its functions, including, but not limited to, the
collection of amounts owed to reimburse the State for the cost of assigned counsel, as
follows:
A. Case information and individual client information with respect to court
proceedings that are confidential by statute or court rule in which one or more parties
are represented by assigned counsel; and
B. The name, address, date of birth and social security number of any person ordered
by the court to reimburse the State for some or all of the cost of assigned counsel.
Information received by the commission from the Judicial Department and registers under
this subsection remains confidential in the possession of the commission and is not open to
public inspection, except that the names of criminal defendants and the names of juvenile
defendants charged with offenses that if committed by an adult would constitute murder or
a Class A, Class B or Class C crime are not confidential.
Sec. C-28. 4 MRSA c. 41 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 41
Page 23 - 132LR1103(01)

COURT VISITORS
§2001. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Court. Prior to January 1, 2029, "court" means the state Probate Court established
in section 201-A, subsection 2, paragraph B. Beginning January 1, 2029, "court" means
the Probate Court established in section 407, subsection 1.
2. Visitor. "Visitor" means a person appointed to act as the court's agent pursuant to
Title 18-C, section 5-304, 5-405 or 5-506.
§2002. Roster of visitors
Rules adopted by the Supreme Judicial Court govern the establishment and
maintenance of a roster of individuals eligible for appointment as a visitor. The rules must
address:
1. Application process. The process for applying to be included on the roster,
including application forms;
2. Criteria. Criteria for initial listing on the roster, including:
A. Credentials, including professional licenses required, if any, and minimum
education requirements;
B. Core training including training on financial exploitation, domestic abuse and
violence; and
C. Good character;
3. Continuing education. Continuing education requirements including no less than
2 hours of training annually on financial exploitation, domestic abuse and violence;
4. Criminal background check. Obtaining criminal history record information on an
individual who seeks to be listed on the roster, including, at a minimum, criminal history
record information from the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police, State
Bureau of Identification;
5. Other requirements. Any other requirements necessary to remain in good standing
and included on the roster; and
6. Removal. The process for removing an individual from the roster.
§2003. Visitor responsibilities
1. Standards of conduct. Visitors shall abide by the standards of conduct as adopted
by rule by the Supreme Judicial Court.
2. General responsibilities. An individual appointed by the court to serve as a visitor
serves as the court's agent and is entitled to quasi-judicial immunity for acts performed
within the scope of the duties of the visitor. As a quasi-judicial officer, the visitor shall
perform the assigned duties independently and impartially in all relevant matters within the
scope of the order of appointment, respecting the court's obligation to dispose of all judicial
matters promptly, efficiently and fairly as provided in the Maine Code of Judicial Conduct.
A visitor shall:
Page 24 - 132LR1103(01)

A. Understand and uphold the law and court orders related to the visitor's appointment;
B. Maintain the highest standards of professionalism, cultural sensitivity and ethics;
C. Plan, carry out, document and complete the visitor's duties as set forth in statute or
court order in a timely fashion;
D. Communicate with the respondent in the manner the respondent is best able to
understand, in light of the respondent's abilities, limitations and needs;
E. Make well-reasoned and factually based written recommendations as required by
statute or directed by the order of appointment; and
F. Complete assignments and written reports in a timely manner and communicate
effectively with the court in reports, recommendations and testimony.
§2004. Appointment order; payment
1. Appointment of visitor. An order appointing a visitor must specify the terms and
conditions of the appointment as provided in the appointment statute, this chapter and rules
adopted by the Supreme Judicial Court.
A. A court may appoint, without any findings, any individual listed on the roster.
B. When there is no suitable visitor on the roster that is available for appointment, a
court may, for good cause shown, appoint an individual who, in the opinion of the
appointing court, has the necessary skills and experience. For the purposes of this
paragraph, good cause may include the appointment of a visitor on a pro bono basis.
2. Order. An appointment of a visitor must be by court order.
A. The appointment order must be written on a court-approved form and must specify
the visitor's length of appointment and specific duties, including the filing of a written
report.
B. The visitor has no authority to perform and may not be expected to perform any
duties beyond those specified in the appointment order, unless subsequently ordered to
do so by the court.
C. The visitor must be provided access to the respondent by any agency or person.
D. The visitor must provide to all parties of record copies of all reports filed by the
visitor with the court.
E. The appointment order must specify the hearing or hearings at which the visitor must
appear and be subject to cross-examination.
3. Payment. An order appointing a visitor must specify the fee arrangements,
including whether the visitor's reasonable fees and expenses must be paid from the
respondent's assets or, if the court finds the respondent indigent, by the State.
§2005. Complaint process
1. Rules. The Supreme Judicial Court shall provide by rule for a complaint process
concerning visitors that provides for at least the following:
A. The ability of a party to make a complaint before the final judgment as well as after
the final judgment is issued;
B. Written instructions on how to make a complaint;
Page 25 - 132LR1103(01)

C. Clear criteria for making a complaint;
D. Transparent policies and procedures concerning the investigation of complaints and
the provision of information to complainants;
E. A central database to log and track complaints; and
F. Policies and procedures for using complaints and investigations for recommending
the removal of a visitor from a particular case or other consequences or discipline.
2. Complaint process. The judicial branch shall provide written and electronic
information to communicate the complaint process to the public and to all parties.
3. Minor complaint option. The rules may provide for a minor complaint option that
authorizes corrective action without the necessity of completing the full complaint and
investigatory process.
4. Motion to remove. The complaint process adopted pursuant to this section is in
addition to the right of a party to file a motion to remove a visitor while the case is pending.
The court shall hold a hearing on the motion at the request of the party filing the motion.
The motion may be advanced on the docket and receive priority over other cases when the
court determines that the interests of justice so require.
Sec. C-29. 18-C MRSA §1-111, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended by amending the section headnote to
read:
§1-111. Guardian Children's guardians ad litem
Sec. C-30. 18-C MRSA §1-112 is enacted to read:
§1-112. Payment of guardian ad litem or visitor appointed at public expense
1. Payment of guardian ad litem or visitor appointed at public expense. If a
guardian ad litem or a visitor is appointed in a proceeding under this Title and the order of
appointment directs that all or part of the guardian ad litem's or visitor's fees must be paid
at public expense, the public expense portion of the fees must be paid by the following.
A. If the court is located in a county described in Title 4, section 201-A, subsection 1,
paragraph A, the county shall pay the public expense portion of the fees. If the court
is located in a county described in Title 4, section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph B,
the State shall pay the public expense portion of the fees.
This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2029.
B. Beginning January 1, 2029, the State shall pay the public expense portion of the
fees.
Sec. C-31. 18-C MRSA §1-605, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§1-605. Compensation of court reporters
1. Compensation generally. Court reporters appointed under Title 4, sections 751 to
756 shall, if a transcript is requested by the court or a party, file the original transcript with
the court and receive the same compensation as provided by law for temporary court
reporters as well as mileage at the rate of 10¢ per mile.
Page 26 - 132LR1103(01)

2. Transcripts for court files. When furnishing a transcript for the files of the court,
the court reporter must be paid at the rate prescribed by the Supreme Judicial Court, after
the reporter's bill has been allowed by the judge of the court in which the services were
rendered, by the following.
A. If the court is located in a county described in Title 4, section 201-A, subsection 1,
paragraph A, the county shall pay the cost of the transcript. If the court is located in a
county described in Title 4, section 201-A, subsection 1, paragraph B, the State shall
pay the cost of the transcript.
This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2029.
B. Beginning January 1, 2029, the State shall pay the cost of the transcript.
3. Exception; probate matters. In probate matters, the personal representative,
conservator or guardian shall, in each case out of the estate handled by that personal
representative, conservator or guardian, pay to the register for the county the amount of the
reporter's fees, giving the fees the same priority as provided in section 3-815 for other costs
and expenses of administration, or as otherwise provided for in the case of insolvent estates.
If the estate assets are not sufficient, the court may order payment by the following.
A. If the court is located in a county described in Title 4, section 201-A, subsection 1,
paragraph A, the court may order the county to pay all or part of the reporter's fees. If
the court is located in a county described in Title 4, section 201-A, subsection 1,
paragraph B, the court may order the State to pay all or part of the reporter's fees.
This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2029.
B. Beginning January 1, 2029, the court may order the State to pay all or part of the
reporter's fees.
Sec. C-32. 18-C MRSA §5-119, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. A,
§14, is further amended to read:
1. Attorney for respondent. Unless the court has made a finding that the respondent
is indigent and has appointed an attorney for the respondent on that basis, an attorney for a
respondent in a proceeding under this Act is entitled to reasonable compensation and
reimbursement of reasonable expenses from the property of the respondent. If the court
has made a finding that the respondent is indigent and has appointed an attorney for the
respondent on that basis, the attorney's fees must be paid by the Maine Commission on
Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37.
Sec. C-33. 18-C MRSA §5-205, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
4. Appointment of counsel. A nonconsenting parent whose parental rights have not
been terminated is entitled to court-appointed legal counsel if indigent. In a contested
action, the court may also appoint counsel for any indigent guardian or petitioner when a
parent or legal custodian has counsel. If the court makes a finding that the nonconsenting
parent, guardian or petitioner for whom an attorney is appointed under this subsection is
indigent, the attorney's fees must be paid by the Maine Commission on Public Defense
Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37.
Sec. C-34. 18-C MRSA §5-205, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
Page 27 - 132LR1103(01)

5. Attorney for a minor; notice to minor. If the court determines at any stage of the
proceeding, before or after appointment, that the interests of the minor are or may be
inadequately represented, the court may appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving
consideration to the choice of the minor if the minor has attained 14 years of age. If the
court finds that the minor is indigent, the fees of an attorney appointed under this subsection
must be paid by the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4,
chapter 37. A minor may appear with or through counsel, but the court is not restricted
from requiring the minor to be present for some or all of a hearing or other proceeding. A
minor 14 years of age or older must receive notice of any proceeding subsequent to the
appointment of a guardian through the same means as required for any other party, and the
minor may consent, object or otherwise participate in the proceeding.
Sec. C-35. 18-C MRSA §5-210, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. A,
§20, is further amended to read:
7. Parent's petition to terminate guardianship; burden of proof. A parent may
bring a petition to terminate the guardianship of a minor. A parent's notification to the
court of the revocation of prior consent for a guardianship must be considered a petition to
terminate the guardianship. Before the court may apply the termination requirements in
subsection 6, a party opposing a parent's petition to terminate a guardianship bears the
burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the parent seeking to terminate
the guardianship is currently unfit to regain custody of the minor, in accordance with the
standard set forth in section 5‑204, subsection 2, paragraph C. If the party opposing
termination of the guardianship fails to meet its burden of proof on the question of the
parent's fitness to regain custody, the court shall terminate the guardianship and make any
further order that may be appropriate. In a contested action, the court may appoint counsel
for the minor or for any indigent guardian or parent. If the court finds that the minor,
guardian or parent for whom an attorney is appointed under this subsection is indigent, the
appointed attorney's fees must be paid by the Maine Commission on Public Defense
Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37. In ruling on a petition to terminate a guardianship,
the court may modify the terms of the guardianship or order transitional arrangements
pursuant to section 5‑211.
Sec. C-36. 18-C MRSA §5-305, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Payment. If the court appointing an attorney under subsection 1 finds that the
respondent is indigent, the appointed attorney's fees must be paid by the Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37.
Sec. C-37. 18-C MRSA §5-406, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended by adding at the end a new blocked
paragraph to read:
The fees of an attorney appointed under this subsection must be paid by the Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37 if the court finds
that the respondent is indigent.
Sec. C-38. 18-C MRSA §5-406, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended by adding at the end a new blocked
paragraph to read:
Page 28 - 132LR1103(01)

The fees of an attorney appointed under this subsection must be paid by the Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37 if the court finds
that the parent is indigent.
Sec. C-39. 18-C MRSA §5-507, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended by adding at the end a new blocked
paragraph to read:
The fees of an attorney appointed under this subsection must be paid by the Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37 if the court finds
that the respondent is indigent.
Sec. C-40. 18-C MRSA §5-507, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended by adding at the end a new blocked
paragraph to read:
The fees of an attorney appointed under this subsection must be paid by the Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37 if the court finds
that the parent is indigent.
Sec. C-41. 18-C MRSA §9-106, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
§9-106. Legal representation
1. Attorney for parents. The parents are entitled to an attorney for any hearing held
pursuant to this Article. If a parent or putative parent wants an attorney but is unable to
afford one, the parent or the putative parent may request the court to appoint an attorney.
If the court finds the requesting party indigent, the court shall appoint and pay the
reasonable costs and expenses of the attorney of the indigent party an attorney and the
attorney's fees must be paid by the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant
to Title 4, chapter 37. The attorney may not be the attorney for the adoptive parents.
2. Attorney for minor indigent parent. When the adoptee is unrelated to the
petitioner, the court shall appoint an attorney who is not the attorney for the adoptive
parents to represent a minor indigent parent at every stage of the proceedings unless the
minor indigent parent refuses representation or the court determines that representation is
unnecessary. The fees of an attorney appointed for a minor indigent parent under this
subsection must be paid by the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to
Title 4, chapter 37.
Sec. C-42. 18-C MRSA §9-315, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt.
A, §2 and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
A. If the adoptee is a minor, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem on behalf of
the minor adoptee and shall consider the best interest of the child, taking into account
the factors set forth in Title 19‑A, section 1653, subsection 3. The court shall sustain
the decree unless there is clear and convincing evidence of one or more bases for
annulment and that the decree is not in the best interest of the child. The court may
allocate the costs of the guardian ad litem to one or more of the parties or, if the parties
are indigent, the court shall pay the reasonable costs and expenses of the guardian ad
litem.
Page 29 - 132LR1103(01)

The court may allocate the costs of the guardian ad litem to one or more of the parties
and may appoint counsel for a minor adoptee or a party to the annulment proceedings.
If the court finds that the minor adoptee or the party for whom counsel is appointed
under this paragraph is indigent, the appointed attorney's fees must be paid by the
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, chapter 37. A
minor adoptee may appear and be represented by counsel.
Sec. C-43. Effective date. This Part takes effect January 1, 2027.
PART D
Sec. D-1. 4 MRSA c. 7, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. D-2. 4 MRSA c. 7-A is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 7-A
PROBATE COURT
§407. Establishment; court of record; seal; process; contempt power
1. Establishment; court of record; seal. A Probate Court for the State is established
as a court of record. The Chief Judge of the Probate Court shall establish the official seal
of the court and provide the official seal to the Register of Probate in each county.
2. Process; contempt power. The Probate Court may issue any process necessary for
the discharge of official duties and may punish for contempt of the court's authority.
§408. Oaths and acknowledgments
All oaths required to be taken by personal representatives, trustees, guardians or
conservators, or of any other persons in relation to any proceeding in the Probate Court, or
to perpetuate the evidence of the publication of any order of notice, may be administered
by the Probate Court Judge or Register of Probate or any notary public. A certificate
thereof, when taken out of court, must be returned into the registry of probate and there
filed. When any person of whom such oath is required, including any parent acknowledging
consent to an adoption, resides temporarily or permanently outside of the State, the oath or
acknowledgment may be taken before and be certified by a notary public in another state,
a commissioner for the State or a United States Consul.
§409. General jurisdiction; transfer of certain proceedings to District Court
1. Estates and trusts. The Probate Court has jurisdiction in the following matters.
A. The Probate Court in each county may take the probate of wills and grant letters
testamentary or of administration on the estates of all deceased persons who, at the time
of their death, were inhabitants or residents of the county or who, not being residents
of the county, died leaving an estate to be administered in the county, or whose estate
is afterwards found in the county; and has jurisdiction of all matters relating to the
settlement of such estates.
B. The Probate Court has jurisdiction in equity, concurrent with the Superior Court, of
all cases and matters relating to the administration of the estates of deceased persons,
to wills and to trusts that are created by will or other written instrument. Such
Page 30 - 132LR1103(01)

410 jurisdiction may be exercised upon complaint according to the usual course of
421 proceedings in civil actions in which equitable relief is sought.
2. Adoptions, name changes, guardianships, conservatorships and other
protective arrangements. The Probate Court has, to the extent authorized in Title 18-C,
jurisdiction over adoptions, name change petitions, guardianships, conservatorships and
other protective arrangements and has jurisdiction as to persons under guardianship,
conservatorship or other protective arrangements, except in cases in which the District
Court has exclusive jurisdiction over a child pursuant to section 152, subsection 5-A.
3. Disclosure of orders and proceedings involving parental rights. The Probate
Court shall require all parties in any matter involving guardianship, adoption or change of
name or another matter involving custody or other parental rights with respect to a minor
child to disclose whether they have knowledge of:
A. Any interim or final order then in effect concerning custody or other parental rights
with respect to the minor child, including any order of the District Court terminating
parental rights; appointing a guardian, including a permanency, emergency or interim
guardian; awarding parental rights to a 3rd party; or granting an adoption;
B. Any proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code brought against the minor child
pending in District Court or any proceeding involving custody or other parental rights
with respect to the minor child pending before any court of this State or another state,
including the District Court; or
C. Any other related action pending before any court of this State or another state,
including the District Court.
4. Transfer of certain proceedings to District Court. Except as provided in
subsection 3, if in a matter before the Probate Court concerning a minor child the Probate
Court becomes aware that a proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code brought against the
minor child or a proceeding involving custody or other parental rights with respect to the
minor child is pending in the District Court or that the minor child is or was the subject of
a District Court order terminating parental rights, appointing a guardian, including a
permanency, emergency or interim guardian, awarding parental rights to a 3rd party or
granting an adoption, the Probate Court shall notify the District Court and take appropriate
action to facilitate a transfer of the matter to the District Court. If a matter is transferred to
the District Court under this subsection, the District Court has continuing, exclusive
jurisdiction over the matter and over any future proceedings for guardianship, adoption or
change of name or other matter involving custody or other parental rights with respect to
the minor child brought under Title 18‑C, except to the extent that the District Court's
jurisdiction is precluded by the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.
5. Exception to transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Probate Court shall retain jurisdiction over an action for guardianship, adoption, change of
name or other matter involving custody or other parental rights with respect to a minor
child brought under Title 18‑C that would otherwise be within the exclusive, continuing
jurisdiction of the District Court under section 152, subsection 5‑A and may not transfer
that matter to the District Court under subsection 2 if:
A. At the time the proceeding under the Maine Juvenile Code or the proceeding
involving custody or other parental rights with respect to the minor child that would
Page 31 - 132LR1103(01)

415 otherwise trigger the District Court's continuing, exclusive jurisdiction is initiated, the
426 testimonial hearing on the Title 18‑C matter has concluded and the Probate Court has
437 that matter under advisement; and
B. The Probate Court has not determined that the District Court is the more appropriate
forum for the Title 18‑C proceeding.
For purposes of this section, a proceeding is pending if a complaint, petition or post-
judgment motion has been filed and the final judgment or final order on that complaint,
petition or post-judgment motion has not yet been issued.
§410. Jurisdiction in court where proceedings originate
Subject to Title 18-C, sections 1-303, 3-201, 5-106 and 9-104, and except as otherwise
provided in Title 18-C, section 5-105, when a case is originally within the jurisdiction of
the Probate Court in 2 or more counties, the one that first commences proceedings retains
jurisdiction exclusively throughout. The jurisdiction assumed in any case, except in cases
of fraud, so far as it depends on the residence of any person or the locality or amount of
property, may not be contested in any proceeding except on an appeal or removal from the
Probate Court in the original case or when the want of jurisdiction appears on the same
record.
§411. Judges; appointment; qualifications; remuneration; full-time duties
1. Appointment; term. The Governor, subject to review by the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters and to confirmation
by the Legislature, shall appoint to the Probate Court 9 judges. Each Probate Court Judge
has a term of office of 7 years.
2. Qualifications. To be eligible for appointment as a Probate Court Judge, an
individual must be a member of the bar of the State.
3. Salary; expenses. Except as provided in subsection 4 for the Chief Judge of the
Probate Court, each Probate Court Judge is entitled to receive a salary equivalent to the
salary of an Associate Judge of the District Court under section 157, subsections 4 and 4-A
and to reimbursement by the State for expenses to the same extent that a District Court
Judge is entitled to reimbursement by the State for expenses under section 157, subsection
5.
4. Designation of Chief Judge; salary; expenses. The Chief Justice of the Supreme
Judicial Court shall designate one Probate Court Judge appointed under subsection 1 as the
Chief Judge of the Probate Court. The Chief Judge of the Probate Court is entitled to
receive a salary equivalent to the salary of the Chief Judge of the District Court under
section 157, subsection 2 and to reimbursement by the State for expenses to the same extent
that a District Court Judge is entitled to reimbursement by the State for expenses under
section 157, subsection 5.
5. Full-time duties. A Probate Court Judge appointed under this section shall devote
full time to that judge's judicial duties and, during that judge's term of office, may not
practice law or be the partner or associate of any person in the practice of law.
§412. Duties of Chief Judge
Page 32 - 132LR1103(01)

The Chief Judge of the Probate Court is responsible to and under the supervision of the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court for the operation of the Probate Court and shall
serve as Chief Judge at the pleasure of the Chief Justice. The Chief Judge shall:
1. Hold court when necessary. Hold court in any county when the Chief Judge
determines it necessary by reason of illness, absence or disability of the Probate Court
Judge regularly assigned or by reason of an excessive case load in any county;
2. Assign judges. Assign Probate Court Judges to hold court in any county where, in
the judgment of the Chief Judge, they are needed;
3. Days and hours for holding court. Subject to the requirements of section 413,
subsection 4, fix the days and hours for holding court in each county and provide public
notification of such days and hours as provided in section 415;
4. Vacations. Determine the time for the taking of vacations by each Probate Court
Judge;
5. Records and reports. Prescribe, subject to the approval of the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Judicial Court or the Chief Justice's designee, the records to be kept and destroyed
and the reports to be made by each Probate Court Judge;
6. Statistics. Collect such statistics and other information pertaining to the business of
the Probate Court as are requested by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court or
the Chief Justice's designee;
7. Budget. Utilizing such assistance from the Administrative Office of the Courts as
the Chief Judge may request, prepare and submit a proposed annual budget for the Probate
Court to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court or the Chief Justice's designee.
The proposed annual budget for the Probate Court may not include expenses related to the
operation of county registries of probate or revenue from fees, fines or penalties collected
by the Probate Court and allocated to the county pursuant to Title 18-C, sections 1-501,
1-511, 1-603 and 1-607 or any other provision of law;
8. Report. Render to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court an annual report
on the state of business in the Probate Court and on the conferences held pursuant to
subsection 10;
9. Courtroom facilities. Pursuant to section 413, make necessary arrangements for
safe and accessible courtroom facilities in each county; establish headquarters with
appropriate facilities for the Chief Judge; and establish quarters and facilities for each
Probate Court Judge;
10. Conference of judges. Convene at least once annually at such place as the Chief
Judge considers appropriate a conference of Probate Court Judges to consider and take
action upon or make recommendations with respect to current problems in the operation of
the Probate Court. The expenses of Probate Court Judges attending this conference are an
expense of the Probate Court;
11. Development and implementation of administrative concepts. Carry on a
continuous survey and study of the organization, operation, condition of business, practice
and procedure of the Probate Court and make recommendations to the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Judicial Court concerning the number of judges and other personnel, other than
personnel in the county registries of probate, required for the efficient administration of
Page 33 - 132LR1103(01)

414 justice and examine, with the advice of the Probate Court Judges and Registers of Probate,
425 the status of dockets of the various Probate Courts to determine whether the business of the
436 court is being carried out in an efficient manner and that emergency matters are prioritized
447 and addressed expediently. From such an examination, the Chief Judge shall annually
458 make recommendations to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court for guidelines
469 and policies for the scheduling and trial of matters before the Probate Court. In providing
570 recommendations, the Chief Judge shall give due and appropriate regard to the
581 recommendations of the Probate Court Judges and the Registers of Probate and shall
592 provide a mechanism whereby their individual recommendations and comments may be
1503 brought to the attention of the Chief Justice. The Chief Judge, in advising as to the
1514 appropriateness of the methods or systems for scheduling trials and the management of
1525 matters before the Probate Court, shall take into consideration systems and methods
1536 operational in the Superior Court and the District Court. The final decision as to the
1547 management of judicial branch personnel and the implementation of guidelines, policies
1558 and procedures for the scheduling of trials and management of matters before the Probate
1569 Court must be made by the Chief Justice only after consultation with the Chief Judge; and
12. Other duties. Perform such additional duties as may be assigned by the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court.
§413. Probate Court regions; place for holding court
1. Probate Court regions. The State is divided into 8 Probate Court regions, named
and defined as follows:
A. Region 1 consists of York County;
B. Region 2 consists of Cumberland County;
C. Region 3 consists of Oxford, Franklin and Androscoggin counties;
D. Region 4 consists of Kennebec and Somerset counties;
E. Region 5 consists of Penobscot and Piscataquis counties;
F. Region 6 consists of Sagadahoc, Lincoln, Knox and Waldo counties;
G. Region 7 consists of Hancock and Washington counties; and
H. Region 8 consists of Aroostook County.
2. Assignment. The Chief Judge of the Probate Court shall assign at least one Probate
Court Judge as the primary judge to hold court in each region.
3. Place for holding court. In each county within each region, the Chief Judge of the
Probate Court shall designate a place for holding court that is located, to the extent possible
given the other requirements of this subsection, in the building holding the office of that
county's Register of Probate. The Chief Judge, with the advice and approval of the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services, is
empowered to negotiate on behalf of the State the leases, contracts and other arrangements
the Chief Judge considers necessary, within the limits of the budget and funds available, to
provide suitable quarters, adequately furnished and equipped for the Probate Court in each
county.
If the Chief Judge is unable to negotiate the leases, contracts and other arrangements as
provided in this subsection, the Chief Judge may, with the advice and approval of the
Page 34 - 132LR1103(01)

413 Bureau of General Services, negotiate on behalf of the State the leases, contracts and other
424 arrangements the Chief Judge considers necessary, within the limits of the budget and funds
435 available, to provide suitable quarters, adequately furnished and equipped for the Probate
446 Court in other publicly owned or privately owned buildings.
4. Exception; Aroostook County. Notwithstanding subsection 3, the Chief Judge of
the Probate Court shall secure facilities for the Probate Court in Region 8 to hold court at
least 2 times each year at Fort Kent and at least 4 times each year at Caribou. The time for
holding the court must be appointed by the Chief Judge of the Probate Court and made
known by public notification as provided in section 415.
5. Exception; alternative locations. Notwithstanding subsection 3, the Probate Court
may hold hearings for matters in equity and contested cases at such time and place in the
county as the Probate Court may appoint and make all necessary orders and decrees relating
thereto.
§414. Officers execute processes and attend courts
Sheriffs, their deputies and constables shall execute all legal processes directed to them
by a Probate Court, which may, when necessary, require such officer, when not in
attendance upon any other court, to attend during the sitting of the Probate Court, for which
that officer must be paid as in other courts for similar services.
§415. Continuous session; return day for matters requiring public notice
The Probate Court is always open in each county for all matters over which it has
jurisdiction, except upon days on which by law no court is held, but it shall have certain
fixed days and places to be made known by public notification thereof in their respective
counties to which all matters requiring public notice must be made returnable, except as
otherwise ordered by the Chief Judge of the Probate Court. In case of the absence of the
assigned Probate Court Judge at the time of holding any court, the Register of Probate or
acting register may adjourn the same unless the Chief Judge of the Probate Court assigns
another Probate Court Judge to attend.
§416. Conflict of interest; transfer of proceeding
1. Probate Court Judge conflict of interest. When a Probate Court Judge is
interested in that judge's own right in a trust that is not fully executed, or in any other
manner in an estate, or is within the degree of kindred by which in law that judge may, by
possibility, be heir to any part of the estate of the person deceased, or is named as executor,
trustee of a trust that is not fully executed or guardian of minor children in the will of any
deceased resident of the county, the judge must be recused from any proceedings related to
the trust or settlement of the estate unless said disability is removed.
This subsection may not be construed to require recusal by a Probate Court Judge who is
named as executor, trustee or guardian of minor children in a will if the judge does not
receive a benefit from the will and the record of the court discloses the filing of the judge's
declination to act as such executor, trustee or guardian and if no objection is raised by any
interested party at the hearing on the petition for probate of the will.
2. Probate Court Judge not to draft documents. A Probate Court Judge may not
draft or aid in drafting any document or paper that the Probate Court Judge is by law
required to pass upon.
Page 35 - 132LR1103(01)

3. Register of Probate conflict of interest; transfer of proceeding. When a Register
of Probate is interested in that register's own right in a trust that is not fully executed, or in
any other manner in an estate, or is within the degree of kindred by which in law that
register may, by possibility, be heir to any part of the estate of the person deceased, or is
named as executor, trustee of a trust that is not fully executed or guardian of minor children
in the will of any deceased resident of the county, such estate must be settled in the Probate
Court of any adjoining county, which has full jurisdiction thereof as if the deceased had
died in that adjoining county. If the register's interest arises after jurisdiction over such
estate has been assumed or existed at the time of the register's election to office, and in all
cases where an executor, administrator, guardian or trustee, whose trust is not fully
executed, becomes the Register of Probate for the county in which that register's letters
were granted, further proceedings must be transferred to the Probate Court in any adjoining
county and there remain until completed, unless said disability is removed before that time.
Whenever in any case within this subsection the disability of the Register of Probate is
removed before the proceedings have been fully completed, the proceedings must then be
transferred to the Probate Court in the county of original jurisdiction or to the Probate Court
that otherwise would have had jurisdiction. In all such cases the register in such adjoining
county shall transmit copies of all records relating to such estate to the probate office of the
county where such estate belongs, to be there recorded. If there are fewer than 4 counties
adjoining the county of the Probate Court that is required to transfer proceedings to an
adjoining county under this subsection, the proceedings must be transferred to the Probate
Court in one of the 4 counties nearest to the transferring Probate Court, as measured by the
shortest distance along paved roads between the building in which the registry of probate
is located in the transferring county and the building in which the registry of probate is
located in the other county.
This subsection may not be construed to require removal to another county by reason of
the Register of Probate having been named as executor, trustee or guardian of minor
children in a will, if the register does not receive a benefit from the will and the record of
the court discloses the filing of the register's declination to act as such executor, trustee or
guardian and if no objection is raised by any interested party at the hearing on the petition
for probate of the will.
§417. Rights of claimants under heir
Any person claiming under an heir at law has the same rights as the heir in all
proceedings in Probate Court, including rights of appeal.
§418. Perpetual care of cemetery lots by order
In any case in which an estate is under the Probate Court's jurisdiction for probate, the
Probate Court may order that an appropriate amount out of the estate be set aside for
perpetual care and suitable memorials for the cemetery lot in which the deceased is buried
and order special care of such lots when the conditions and size of the estate seem to warrant
such order.
§419. Contracts for support
1. Approval required. All contracts for support for life must be approved by the
Probate Court in the county in which the support for life is to be rendered. The Probate
Court shall grant approval after such reasonable notice as the court determines to be
Page 36 - 132LR1103(01)

415 appropriate, if the court finds, after hearing, that the contract is just and equitable under all
426 of the circumstances.
2. Admissibility in evidence. A contract or agreement for support for life that has not
been approved under subsection 1 may not be received in evidence unless the person
offering the contract or agreement establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the
contract or agreement is just and equitable under all of the circumstances.
3. Exception. This section does not apply to contracts or agreements for support for
life between persons related within the 3rd degree.
§420. Commission to Evaluate the Incorporation of the Probate Court into the
Judicial Branch
1. Commission established. The Commission to Evaluate the Incorporation of the
Probate Court into the Judicial Branch, referred to in this section as "the commission," is
established.
2. Membership. The commission consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
A. Two members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate, including one
member from each of the 2 parties holding the largest number of seats in the
Legislature;
B. Three members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, including members from each of the 2 parties holding the
largest number of seats in the Legislature;
C. Three members appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court;
D. One member who is a Probate Court Judge appointed by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Judicial Court;
E. One member who is a Register of Probate appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives;
F. One member who is a judicial branch clerk appointed by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Judicial Court;
G. One member who is a member of the Probate and Trust Law Advisory Commission,
established pursuant to Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 73-B, appointed by that
commission;
H. One member who is a member of the Family Law Advisory Commission,
established pursuant to Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 52-A, appointed by that
commission; and
I. Two members who are members of the Maine State Bar Association, one of whom
is a member of a nonprofit organization providing statewide free legal services,
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
3. Chairs; quorum. The first-named Senate member is the Senate chair and the first-
named House of Representatives member is the House chair of the commission. A quorum
of the commission consists of 8 members.
4. Appointments; convening of commission. All appointments must be made no later
than January 1, 2031. The appointing authorities shall notify the Executive Director of the
Page 37 - 132LR1103(01)

412 Legislative Council once all appointments have been completed. After appointment of all
423 members, the chairs shall call and convene the first meeting of the commission. If 30 days
434 or more after January 1, 2031 a majority of but not all appointments have been made, the
445 chairs may request authority and the Legislative Council may grant authority for the
456 commission to meet and conduct its business.
5. Duties. The commission shall conduct a thorough review of the Probate Court
system, including but not limited to the interaction between the state Probate Court and
county registries of probate; the establishment and allocation of Probate Court fees; the
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services' responsibility for oversight and payment
of attorneys appointed by the Probate Court to represent indigent parties in Probate Court
proceedings pursuant to chapter 37; and the judicial branch's responsibility for oversight of
visitors appointed by the Probate Court and for payment of court-appointed visitors when
the Probate Court is allowed or directed by law to appoint a visitor at state expense. The
review must include, but is not limited to, an evaluation of:
A. Whether the number of Probate Court Judge positions is appropriate or should be
adjusted;
B. Whether the jurisdiction of the Probate Court, District Court and Superior Court
should be adjusted to increase judicial efficiency and access to justice;
C. Whether the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court should be authorized to
assign Probate Court Judges to sit in the Superior Court or the District Court and to
assign Superior Court Justices and District Court Judges to sit in the Probate Court;
D. Whether additional investments should be made to enhance the compatibility of the
Probate Court's case management system with the case management system used by
the other courts in the judicial branch; and
E. Whether additional steps should be taken to more fully incorporate the Probate Court
into the judicial branch, including whether to transfer the functions and staff of the
county registries of probate into the judicial branch.
6. Compensation. Legislative members of the commission are entitled to receive the
legislative per diem, as defined in Title 3, section 2, and reimbursement for travel and other
necessary expenses for their attendance at authorized meetings of the commission. Public
members not otherwise compensated by their employers or other entities that they represent
are entitled to receive reimbursement of necessary expenses and, upon a demonstration of
financial hardship, a per diem equal to the legislative per diem for their attendance at
authorized meetings of the commission.
7. Staffing. The Legislative Council shall provide staff support for the operation of
the commission, except that Legislative Council staff support is not authorized when the
Legislature is in regular or special session.
8. Information and assistance. The Administrative Office of the Courts, the Chief
Judge of the Probate Court and Registers of Probate shall provide to the commission the
information and assistance requested by the commission that is necessary for the
commission to perform its duties.
9. Report. No later than December 31, 2031, the commission shall submit a report
that includes its findings and recommendations, which may include suggested legislation,
for presentation to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
Page 38 - 132LR1103(01)

415 judiciary matters. The joint standing committee may report out legislation related to the
426 report to the 135th Legislature.
10. Repeal. This section is repealed June 1, 2032.
Sec. D-3. 4 MRSA §1201, sub-§12-C is enacted to read:
12-C. Judge. "Judge" means a Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court or the Superior
Court, any Judge of the District Court, any Probate Court Judge, any Administrative Court
Judge or any Associate Administrative Court Judge who is actively serving as of December
1, 1984, or who is appointed subsequent to December 1, 1984, but does not include Active
Retired Judges.
Sec. D-4. 18-C MRSA §1-201, sub-§8-A is enacted to read:
8-A. Court. "Court" means the Probate Court established in Title 4, section 407,
subsection 1.
Sec. D-5. 18-C MRSA §1-305, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and affected
by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
§1-305. Records and certified copies; judicial supervision
The register shall maintain records and files and provide copies of documents as
provided in sections 1-501 to 1-511 and further records and copies as the Supreme Judicial
Court may by rule provide. The register is subject to the supervision and authority of the
judge of the court assigned by the Chief Judge of the Probate Court under Title 4, section
413, subsection 2 as the primary Probate Court Judge in the region in which the register
serves.
Sec. D-6. 18-C MRSA §1-309-A is enacted to read:
§1-309-A. Judges
A judge of the court must be chosen and shall serve as provided in Title 4, chapter 7-A.
Sec. D-7. 18-C MRSA §1-506, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
In the case of an absence of the register in a county where a deputy register has not
been appointed or in the case of a vacancy in the office of register due to death, resignation
or any other cause, the judge assigned by the Chief Judge of the Probate Court under Title
4, section 413, subsection 2 as the primary Probate Court Judge in the region shall appoint
a suitable person to act as register pro tempore until the register resumes the duties of office
or another person is qualified as register. A register pro tempore must be sworn and, if the
judge requires it, shall give bond as in the case of the register.
Sec. D-8. 18-C MRSA §1-507, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and affected
by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
§1-507. Inspection of register's conduct of office
A The judge assigned by the Chief Judge of the Probate Court under Title 4, section
413, subsection 2 as the primary Probate Court Judge in the region shall constantly inspect
the conduct of the register with respect to the register's records and duties and give
information in writing of any breach of the register's bond to the treasurer of the county,
who shall bring a civil action. Any funds recovered in the civil action must be applied
Page 39 - 132LR1103(01)

412 toward the expenses of completing the records of the register under the direction of the
423 judge and the surplus, if any, must inure to the county. If the funds are insufficient, the
434 treasurer may recover the deficiency from the register in a civil action.
Sec. D-9. 18-C MRSA §1-510, sub-§1, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. Be an administrator, guardian, commissioner of insolvency, appraiser or divider
of an estate, in a case within the jurisdiction of the court located in the county in which
the register is register, except as provided in Title 4, chapter 7-A, or be in any manner
interested in the fees and emoluments arising from such an estate in that capacity; or
Sec. D-10. 21-A MRSA §1, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is
amended to read:
11. County office. "County office" means the office of judge of probate, register of
probate, county treasurer, register of deeds, sheriff, district attorney or county
commissioner.
Sec. D-11. 21-A MRSA §601, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 273, §10, is
further amended to read:
3. Order of offices. The order of offices on the ballot is as follows: President, United
States Senator, Governor, Representative to Congress, State Senator and Representative to
the Legislature, and the county offices in the following order: judge of probate, register of
probate, county treasurer, register of deeds, sheriff, district attorney and county
commissioner, except that the order may be modified to allow ranked-choice contests to be
printed on the opposite side of the ballot, separate from contests other than ranked-choice
contests.
Sec. D-12. Transition provision. A Probate Court Judge appointed to the state
Probate Court pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4, section 301-A, subsection 2
prior to January 1, 2029 continues to serve as a Probate Court Judge in the Probate Court
established in Title 4, chapter 7-A until the expiration of the term to which the judge was
appointed.
Sec. D-13. Effective date. This Part takes effect January 1, 2029.